Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1502
Delinquent accounts; how collected.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, delinquent accounts shall be collected in the manner provided by sections 72-1501 to 72-1503.

Laws 1982, LB 931, § 2.